Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2316
Unlicensed person; acts permitted.

The Nurse Practitioner Practice Act does not prohibit the performance of activities of a nurse practitioner by a person who does not have a license or temporary license under the act if performed:

(1) In an emergency situation;

(2) By a legally qualified person from another state employed by the United States Government and performing official duties in this state; or

(3) By a person enrolled in an approved nurse practitioner program for the preparation of nurse practitioners as part of that approved program.

Laws 1984, LB 724, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 40;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 58;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 71;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1726.01;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 808;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 77.